Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 5 Timber Products

Cross references.

Preservation of forest resources and other plant life generally, T. 12, C. 6.

Provision that planting and growing of trees and fruits and products thereof shall be considered an agricultural pursuit, §

44-14-100

.

Provisions in state construction contracts pertaining to exclusive use of Georgia forest products, §

50-5-63

.